Idaho statutes. Title 31 COUNTIES AND COUNTY LAW
Chapter 6
COUNTIES AS BODIES CORPORATE

Sec.

§ 31-601. Every county a body corporate.

Every county is a body politic and corporate, and as such has the powers specified in this title or in other statutes, and such powers as are necessarily implied from those expressed.

§ 31-602. Exercise of powers.

Its powers can only be exercised by the board of county commissioners, or by agents and officers acting under their authority, or authority of law. The purchasing power of the county, and the authority to contract for purchases, may be delegated to another elected official or an employee of the county by the board of county commissioners.

§ 31-603. Corporate name.

The name of a county designated in the law creating it is its corporate name, and it must be known and designated thereby in all actions and proceedings touching its corporate rights, property and duties.

§ 31-604. Enumeration of powers.

It has power:

To sue and be sued.

To purchase and hold lands.

To make such contracts, and purchase and hold such personal property, as may be necessary to the exercise of its powers.

To make such orders for the disposition or use of its property as the interests of its inhabitants require.

To levy and collect such taxes for purposes under its exclusive jurisdiction as are authorized by law.

Such other and further authority as may be necessary to effectively carry out the duties imposed on it by the provisions of the Idaho Code and constitution.

§ 31-605. Counties not to loan credit.

No county must in any manner loan or give its credit to or in aid of any person, association or corporation unless it is expressly authorized by law so to do.

§ 31-606. Payment of judgments against county. [Repealed.]